noun/noun-irr.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
! University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
! Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Irregular noun forms
! Authors: Martina Bachmann, Melanie Widmer
! Modifications: Reto Baumgartner
! Date: June 2013

Multichar_Symbols +Noun +Fem +Masc +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root
 Substantive;

LEXICON Substantive
matta+Noun+Fem+Sg:matta #;
matta+Noun+Fem+Pl:mattas #;
matta+Noun+Fem+Pl:mattauns #;
dunna+Noun+Fem+Sg:dunna #;
dunna+Noun+Fem+Pl:dunnas #;
dunna+Noun+Fem+Pl:dunnauns #;
um+Noun+Masc+Sg:um #;
um+Noun+Masc+Pl:umens #;
savur+Noun+Fem+Sg:savur #;
savur+Noun+Fem+Pl:savurs #;
savur+Noun+Fem+Pl:savuors #;
pare+Noun+Fem+Sg:pare #;
pare+Noun+Fem+Pl:pareis #;
cavriel+Noun+Masc+Sg:cavriel #;
cavriel+Noun+Masc+Pl:cavreuls #;
